District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.91

Scope of practice for electricians.

(a)

For the purposes of this part, the term “electrician” means any person who designs, installs, maintains, alters, converts, changes, repairs, removes, or inspects electrical wiring, equipment, conductors, or systems in buildings or structures or on public and private space for the transmission, distribution, or use of electrical energy for power, heat, light, radio, television, signaling, communications, or any other purpose, except elevators, platform lifts, stairway chair lifts, manlifts, conveyors, escalators, dumbwaiters, material lifts, automated people movers, and other related conveyances.

(b)

This part shall not apply to an elevator contractor or mechanic licensed under part F-i of this subchapter if the elevator contractor or mechanic is performing work incidental to work licensed under part F-i of this subchapter.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(d), 57 DCR 181

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.91.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “For the purposes of this part, the term ‘electrician’ means any person who designs, installs, maintains, alters, converts, changes, repairs, removes or inspects electrical wiring, equipment, conductors, or systems in buildings or structures or on public and private space for the transmission, distribution or use of electrical energy for power, heat, light, radio, television, signaling, communications or any other purpose.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2151(d) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2151(d) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).